Utah statutes.
31A-6a-105.   Prohibited acts.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection 31A-6a-104(2), a service contract
provider may not use in its name, a contract, or literature:
(a)  any of the following words:
(i)  "insurance";
(ii)  "casualty";
(iii)  "surety";
(iv)  "mutual"; or
(v)  another word descriptive of the insurance, casualty, or surety business;
or
(b)  a name deceptively similar to the name or description of:
(i)  an insurance or surety corporation; or
(ii)  another service contract provider.
(2)  A service contract provider or the service contract provider's
representative may not:
(a)  make, permit, or cause to be made a false or misleading statement in
connection with the sale, offer to sell, or advertisement of a service
contract; or
(b)  deliberately omit a material statement that would be considered
misleading if omitted, in connection with the sale, offer to sell, or
advertisement of a service contract.
(3)  A bank, savings and loan association, insurance company, or other lending
institution may not require the purchase of a service contract as a condition
of a loan.
(4)  Except for a bank, savings and loan association, industrial bank, or
credit union, a service contract provider, unless licensed by the department,
may not sell, or be the obligated party for:
(a)  a guaranteed asset protection waiver;
(b)  a debt cancellation agreement; or
(c)  a debt suspension agreement.
